Washington statutes.
RCW 18.47.020

Certification requirements.

(1) A birth doula may voluntarily apply for certification from the department under this section.

(2) The department shall issue a certification to any applicant who has met the following requirements:

(a) Submitted a completed application as required by the department;

(b) Satisfactorily completed competencies that meet the requirements established by the secretary;

(c) Has not engaged in unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW 18.130.180;

(d) Is not currently subject to any disciplinary proceedings; and

(e) Paid a certification fee established by the secretary in rule.

(3) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of certifications and the discipline of certified birth doulas under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 217 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 217 ss 1-5: See note following RCW 18.47.010.